Tennessee, session 114, HB1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-3304(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "forty-five (45) days" and substituting "fifty (50) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1132
003180
- 1 -